test/src/morphology/myv-tests-adj-min_gt-norm.yaml
  
  Adjective - ашо: # Ordinary adjectives - full paradigm including MWN
     ашо+A: ашо
     ашо+A+Pred+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ашо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ашонь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ашонь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: ашодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Indef: ашонень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Indef: ашонень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ашонек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ашонек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: ашовтомо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: ашовтомо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Indef: ашошка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Indef: ашошка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Indef: ашосо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Indef: ашосо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Indef: ашосто
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Indef: ашосто
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ашос
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ашос
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Indef: ашова
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Indef: ашова
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: ашокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Lat+Indef: ашов
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Indef: ашов
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+TempCx+Indef: ашоне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+TempCx+Indef: ашоне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Px1Sg: ашом
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px1Sg: [ашом, ашон]
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px1Sg: ашон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Px1Sg: ашодон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Px1Sg: ашодон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Px1Sg: ашовтомон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Sg: ашовтомон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Sg: ашошкан
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Sg: ашошкан
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg: ашосон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg: ашосон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg: ашостон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg: ашостон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+Px1Sg: ашозон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Px1Sg: ашозон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg: ашован
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg: ашован
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Sg: ашоксон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Sg: ашоксон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Px2Sg: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Px2Sg: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Px2Sg: ашодот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Px2Sg: ашодот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg: ашовтомот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg: ашовтомот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Sg: ашошкат
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Sg: ашошкат
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Sg: ашосот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Sg: ашосот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px2Sg: ашостот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px2Sg: ашостот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+Px2Sg: ашозот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Px2Sg: ашозот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px2Sg: ашоват
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px2Sg: ашоват
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px2Sg: ашоксот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px2Sg: ашоксот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Px3Sg: ашозо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg: ашонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg: ашонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Px3Sg: ашодонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Px3Sg: ашодонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Px3Sg: ашонстэнь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Px3Sg: ашонстэнь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg: ашовтомонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg: ашовтомонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg: ашошканзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg: ашошканзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg: ашосонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg: ашосонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg: ашостонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg: ашостонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+Px3Sg: ашозонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Px3Sg: ашозонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px3Sg: ашованзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px3Sg: ашованзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px3Sg: ашоксонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px3Sg: ашоксонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Px1Pl: ашонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Pl: ашонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px1Pl: ашонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px1Pl: ашонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Px1Pl: ашодонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Px1Pl: ашодонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Px1Pl: ашовтомонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Pl: ашовтомонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl: ашошканок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl: ашошканок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl: ашосонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl: ашосонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl: ашостонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl: ашостонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+Px1Pl: ашозонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Px1Pl: ашозонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl: ашованок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl: ашованок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px1Pl: ашоксонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px1Pl: ашоксонок
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Px2Pl: ашонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Px2Pl: ашонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Pl: ашонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Pl: ашонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Px2Pl: ашодонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Px2Pl: ашодонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Pl: ашовтомонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Pl: ашовтомонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl: ашошканк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl: ашошканк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl: ашосонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl: ашосонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px2Pl: ашостонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px2Pl: ашостонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+Px2Pl: ашозонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Px2Pl: ашозонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px2Pl: ашованк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px2Pl: ашованк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px2Pl: ашоксонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px2Pl: ашоксонк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Px3Pl: ашост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Pl: ашост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl: ашост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl: ашост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Px3Pl: ашодост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Px3Pl: ашодост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl: ашовтомост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl: ашовтомост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl: ашошкаст
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl: ашошкаст
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl: ашосост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl: ашосост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Pl: ашостост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Pl: ашостост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+Px3Pl: ашозост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Px3Pl: ашозост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px3Pl: ашоваст
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px3Pl: ашоваст
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Px3Pl: ашоксост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Px3Pl: ашоксост
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ашот
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Sg: ашон
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Sg: ашонзо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашось
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашонтень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашодонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашосонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашостонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашованть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашовтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашошканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашоксонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашотне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашотнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашотненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашотнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашотнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашотнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашотнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: ашотнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашотнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашотнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашотневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашотнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашотненек
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашоседе
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: ашоседе
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашосекс
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: ашосекс
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашосесь
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашосенть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашосентень
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашоседенть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашосесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашосестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашосеванть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашосевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашосешканть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашосексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашосетне
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашосетнень
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашосетненень
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашосетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашосетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашосетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашосетнес
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: ашосетнева
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашосетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашосетнев
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашосетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашосетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашосетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашонзодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: ашонзодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашонзодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: ашонзодо
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашонзокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: ашонзокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашонзокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: ашонзокс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашонзось
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашонзось
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашонзонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашонзонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашонзонтень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашонзонтень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашонзодонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашонзодонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашонзосонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашонзосонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашонзостонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашонзостонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашонзованть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашонзованть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашонзовтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашонзовтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашонзошканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашонзошканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашонзоксонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашонзоксонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашонзотне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашонзотне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашонзотнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашонзотнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашонзотненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашонзотненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашонзотнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашонзотнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашонзотнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашонзотнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашонзотнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашонзотнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашонзотнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашонзотнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: ашонзотнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: ашонзотнева
